test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-puuqdwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - pūʼdõz: # adjectives 183 'eng /est puhas/fin' - full paradigm
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Nom: pūʼdõz
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Gen: pūʼdõ
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Par: pūʼdõzt
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Dat: pūʼdõn
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Ins: pūʼdõks
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Ill: [pūʼdõz, pūʼdõ]
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Ela: pūʼdõst
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Nom: pūʼdõd
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Gen: pūʼdõd
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Par: pūʼdidi
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Dat: pūʼdõdõn
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Ins: pūʼdõdõks
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Ill: pūʼdiž
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Ela: pūʼdist
